Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.060

District boundary changes—Submission to county auditor.

(1) Any district boundary changes, including changes in director district boundaries, shall be submitted to the county auditor by the school district board of directors within thirty days after the changes have been approved by the board. The board shall submit both legal descriptions and maps.

(2) Any boundary changes submitted to the county auditor after the fourth Monday in June of odd-numbered years shall not take effect until the following year.

[ 1991 c 288 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.315.597.]